Nebraska, session 109, LB1058.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1058 LB1058
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-3725, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-3725 (1) The commission shall develop a program to provide
marketing assistance grants to communities and organizations hosting
national or international-caliber events held in Nebraska that have the
potential to attract a significant percentage of out-of-state visitors
and to generate favorable national or international press coverage for
Nebraska.
(2) A community or organization applying for a marketing assistance
grant shall provide a plan to the commission that includes: (a)
Documentation that the event will attract out-of-state visitors; (b)
details regarding the type of marketing that would be carried out with
state funds; (c) methodologies used to track the impact of marketing
efforts and the number of out-of-state visitors attending the event; and
(d) details regarding the potential national or international press
coverage that will be generated by the event.
(3)(a) The commission shall develop a program to provide innovative
tourism grants to communities or organizations that provide tourism and
visitor promotion services, host events, or promote attractions that
result in either (i) an increased number of nonlocal, instate visitors or
(ii) an increased number of both nonlocal, instate visitors and out-of-
state visitors. Innovative tourism grants may include, but not be limited
to, marketing assistance, planning assistance, basic support, and
regional cooperation. Innovative tourism grants shall not be used for
equipment or capital facility development or improvements.
(b) When awarding innovative tourism grants under the program, the
commission shall award up to five hundred thousand dollars in innovative
tourism grants to any such city or village each fiscal year.
(4)(a) The commission shall develop a program to provide a tourism
and visitor promotion grant to an organization that provides tourism and
visitor promotion services in the state through exhibits and trails and
-2-

LB1058 LB1058
2026 2026
that is located along the Missouri River and within five miles of a city
of the first class.
(b)(i) An organization that provides tourism and visitor promotion
services in the state that meets the requirements of subdivision (4)(a)
of this section may apply to the commission, in a manner prescribed by
the commission, for a grant pursuant to this subsection. Such application
shall include the organization's name, documentation that the
organization provides tourism and visitor promotion services, how such
grant shall be used, and any other information that the commission may
require.
(ii) Subject to available funding, the commission shall award a
grant pursuant to this subsection. Such grant may be used for basic
support of an organization awarded such a grant.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one hundred
fifty thousand dollars form the General Fund to the commission for fiscal
year 2026-27 to provide grant funding pursuant to this subsection.
(5) (4) The executive director shall convene a technical review
committee of no fewer than three individuals representing the public
sector, the private sector, and citizens at large. The technical review
committee and the executive director shall review and score applications
for marketing assistance grants and innovative tourism grants and forward
recommendations to the commission for approval by the commission or a
subcommittee of the commission.
(6) (5) Communities and organizations receiving marketing assistance
grants or innovative tourism grants authorized under this section shall
provide a final report to the commission within ninety days after the
completion date of the event that includes event attendance, the use of
funds, and marketing impact information.
(7) (6) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing the grant programs authorized under this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-3725, Revised Statutes Supplement,
-3-

LB1058 LB1058
2026 2026
2025, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-